California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(e) A jurisdiction or recipient is eligible to receive funds from the local return program, described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), only if it continues to contribute to that program an amount that is equal to its existing commitment of local funds or other available funds. The MTA may develop guidelines that, at a minimum, specify maintenance of effort requirements for the local return program, matching funds, and administrative requirements for the recipients of revenue derived from the tax.

(f) Prior to submitting the ordinance to the voters, the MTA shall adopt an expenditure plan for
 the net revenues derived from the tax. The expenditure plan shall include, in addition to other projects and programs identified by the MTA, the specified projects and programs listed in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the estimated total cost for each project and program, funds other than the tax revenues that the MTA anticipates will be expended on the projects and programs, and the schedule during which the MTA anticipates funds will be available for each project and program. The MTA shall also identify in its expenditure plan the expected completion dates for each project described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). To be eligible to receive revenues derived from the tax, an agency sponsoring a capital project or capital program shall submit to the MTA an expenditure plan for its project or program containing the same elements as the expenditure plan that MTA is required by this subdivision to prepare.

(g) The MTA
 shall establish and administer a sales tax revenue fund. The net revenue derived from the tax, after payment of any debt services and related obligations, shall be credited to this fund. The moneys in the fund shall be available to the MTA to meet expenditure and cashflow needs of the projects and programs described in the expenditure plan required under subdivision (f). In the event that there are net revenues in excess of the amount necessary to provide the amount of net revenues specified in the expenditure plan for the projects and programs described therein, the MTA may expend the excess net revenues on projects and programs in the expenditure plan or the LRTP. In the event that projects and programs in the expenditure plan are completed without the expenditure of the amount of net revenues specified, the MTA shall expend the excess net revenues on projects and programs in the expenditure plan or the LRTP within the same subregion as the project or program that is completed. For the purposes of this
 section, “subregion” shall be defined in the LRTP.

(h) If other funds become available and are allocated to provide all or a portion of the amount of net revenues specified in the expenditure plan for the projects or programs described therein, the MTA may expend the surplus net revenues on other projects and programs in the expenditure plan or the LRTP.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (h), if a capital project or capital program described in clauses (i) to (x), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and clauses (i) and (vi) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), has been fully funded from other sources on or before December 31, 2008, the funds designated to the project or program in clauses (i) to (x), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and clauses (i) and (vi) of subparagraph
 (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall remain in the subregion in which the project or program is located and shall be allocated to other projects or programs in the subregion prior to the expiration of the tax.

(2) A capital project or capital program funded with reallocated funds pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be included in the adopted 2008 Long Range Transportation Plan or the successor plan and shall be of regional significance as determined by the MTA. For purposes of this subdivision, “subregions” means the subregions as defined in the LRTP in effect as of January 1, 2008.

(j) Notwithstanding Section 130354, revenues raised under this section may be used to facilitate the transportation of people and goods within Los Angeles County. The use of the revenues shall
 not be limited to public transit purposes.

(k) No later than 365 days prior to the adoption of an amendment described in paragraph (1) to an expenditure plan adopted pursuant to subdivision (f), including, but not limited to, the expenditure plan adopted by the MTA board as “Attachment A” in Ordinance #08-01 adopted by the board on July 24, 2008, and in addition to any other notice requirements in the proposing ordinance, the board shall notify the Members of the Legislature representing the County of Los Angeles of all of the following:

(1) A description of the proposed amendments to the adopted expenditure plan that would do any of the following:

(A) Affect the amount of net revenues derived from the tax imposed pursuant to this act that is proposed to be expended on a capital project or projects identified in the
 adopted expenditure plan.

(B) Delay the schedule for the availability of funds proposed to be expended on a capital project or projects identified in the adopted expenditure plan.

(C) Delay the schedule for the estimated or expected completion date of a capital project or projects identified in the adopted expenditure plan.

(2) The reason for the proposed amendment.

(3) The estimated impact the proposed amendment will have on the schedule, cost, scope, or timely availability of funding for the capital project or projects contained in the adopted expenditure plan.

(l) The notification required pursuant to subdivision (k) shall be achieved by resolution adopted by the MTA board.

(m) The MTA board shall provide prior written notice to the Members of the Legislature representing the County of Los Angeles of any proposed amendments to the adopted expenditure plan that would accelerate funding for a capital project or projects in the adopted expenditure plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.   (SB 767)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

130350.7.

(a) The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (MTA), in addition to any other tax it is authorized to impose or has imposed, may impose a transactions and use tax, for a period to be determined by the MTA, that is applicable in the incorporated and unincorporated areas of Los Angeles County. The rate of tax authorized by this section, when combined with the rate of tax authorized by voter approval of Measure R pursuant to Section 130350.5 during any period when that tax is in effect, and upon the expiration of that tax, shall not exceed 1 percent.

(b) The ordinance imposing the tax shall contain all of the following:

(1) An expenditure plan that lists the transportation projects
 and programs to be funded from net revenues from the tax. The expenditure plan shall appear in the ordinance as an exhibit. The expenditure plan shall include all of the following:

(A) The most recent cost estimates for each project and program identified in the expenditure plan.

(B) The identification of the accelerated cost, if applicable, for each project and program in the expenditure plan.

(C) The approximate schedule during which the MTA anticipates funds will be available for each project and program.

(D) The expected completion dates for each project and program within a three-year range.

(2) Provisions conforming to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with
 Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f).

(3) A provision limiting the MTA’s costs of administering the ordinance and the net revenues from the tax to 1.5 percent of the total tax revenues.

(4) A requirement that the net revenues from the tax, defined to mean the total tax revenues less any refunds, costs of administration by the State Board of Equalization, and the MTA’s administration costs, shall be used by the MTA to fund transportation projects and programs identified in the expenditure plan.

(5) The rate of the tax.

(c) The MTA shall do both of the following:

(1) Develop a transparent process to determine the most
 recent costs estimates for each project and program identified in the expenditure plan.

(2) At least 30 days before submitting the ordinance described in subdivision (b) to the voters, post the expenditure plan on its Internet Web site in a prominent manner.

(d) The ordinance shall be adopted by the MTA board, which shall also adopt a resolution that submits the ordinance to the voters.

(e) The ordinance shall become operative pursuant to Section 130352 if approved by two-thirds of the voters voting on the measure, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2 of Article XIII C of the California Constitution.

(f) (1) If the voters approve the ordinance authorized by this section, the expenditure plan included as an exhibit to the
 ordinance pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall also be included in the revised and updated Long Range Transportation Plan within one year of the date the ordinance takes effect. The revised and updated Long Range Transportation Plan shall also include capital projects and capital programs that are adopted by each subregion that are submitted to the MTA for inclusion in the revised and updated Long Range Transportation Plan, if the cost and schedule details are provided by the subregions, in a manner consistent with the requirements of the plan. Inclusion of a capital project or a capital program in the Long Range Transportation Plan is not a commitment or guarantee that the project or program shall receive any future funding.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “subregion” shall have the same meaning as defined in the Long Range Transportation Plan.

(g) The MTA may
 incur bonded indebtedness payable from the net revenues of the tax pursuant to the bond issuance provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 130500) and any successor act.

(h) The tax authorized by this section shall be imposed pursuant to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), notwithstanding the combined rate limitation in Section 7251.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 273.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

130351.

The County of Los Angeles shall conduct the special election called by the commission pursuant to Section 130350, and the commission shall reimburse the county for its cost in conducting the special election.

The special election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of special elections by a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130352.

Any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing not less than 180 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130353.

Repeal of the transactions and use tax ordinance shall not be operative earlier than the first day of the first calendar quarter following the adoption of the ordinance of repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130354.

The revenues received by the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission from the imposition of the transactions and use taxes shall be used for public transit purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

130355.

Any action or proceeding in which the validity of the adoption of the retail transactions and use tax ordinance provided for in this article or any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced within 90 days after the date this section becomes effective; otherwise, those proceedings, including the adoption and approval of the ordinance, are valid, and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 159, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Transit Service Dispute Resolution [130370. - 130373.]

130370.

(a) Not later than February 1, 1980, the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission, in cooperation with all the transit operators in the County of Los Angeles, shall prepare and submit, for public review and comments, proposed rules and regulations for the resolution of transit service disputes in the county pursuant to Section 130371.

(b) The commission shall adopt such rules and regulations not later than April 1, 1980, by eight affirmative votes of the voting members, or designated alternates, only after a public hearing held at least 30 days prior to their adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

130371.

The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Criteria to determine the definition and validity of a transit service dispute.

(b) Procedures for the submission of a transit service dispute to the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission.

(c) Information, such as the matter in dispute, to be included in the notice to be sent to the parties in the transit service dispute.

(d) Procedure for mediation prior to a hearing before a transit coordination and service committee.

(e) Appointment, if mediation fails, of a transit coordination and service committee consisting of commission members and alternates to hold a public hearing on the transit service dispute in the locality of the dispute and to make recommendations regarding the dispute to the commission.

(f) Actions the commission may take to resolve the transit service dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

130372.

(a) The Los Angeles County Transportation Commission shall have sole authority to resolve any transit service dispute between transit operators in the County of Los Angeles, and its decision with respect to such a dispute shall be final and binding pursuant to the rules and regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 130370.

(b) In resolving a transit service dispute pursuant to rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 130370, the commission, on a case by case basis, may, by eight affirmative votes of the voting members, or designated alternates, take such action notwithstanding Sections 99280, 99281, and 130263.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

130373.

Prior to January 1, 1981, only a transit service dispute submitted by a transit operator in the County of Los Angeles may be resolved by the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Transit Coordination and Service Program [130380. - 130385.]

130380.

Prior to October 1, 1980, the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission, in cooperation with all transit operators in the County of Los Angeles, shall prepare and submit to the Legislature, the county and the cities therein, and the Department of Transportation, for review and comment a proposed transit coordination and service program, including but not limited to, the following:

(a) The definition of institutional relationships between all transit operators in the county and the relationship between the commission and the transit operators.

(b) Full analyses and recommended changes regarding the current distribution of all transit services throughout the county, including levels and types of transit service.

(c) Transit-service productivity guidelines and specific steps to be taken to bring existing transit service into conformity with the guidelines.

(d) Financial standards to be met by all transit operators in the county, as well as guidelines for the utilization of all funds available for transit purposes.

(e) Other transit coordination and service issues and actions deemed appropriate by the commission to promote the efficient and effective use of all available transportation resources in the county so as to maximize the quality and quantity of transit service available to the residents of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

130381.

The Los Angeles County Transportation Commission shall adopt by eight affirmative votes of the voting members, or designated alternates, a transit coordination and service program not later than January 10, 1981, after a public hearing held at least 30 days prior to its adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

130382.

(a) After April 1, 1981, the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission shall implement the recommendations of the transit coordination and service program, except as otherwise provided in Section 130385.

(b) To the extent necessary to implement those recommendations, Sections 99280, 99281, and 130263 shall not be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

130383.

The Los Angeles County Transportation Commission shall adopt an updated transit coordination and service program not later than January 10, 1983, and biennially thereafter, and may amend the program at such time as it deems appropriate, in order to meet changing conditions in providing and funding transit services in the County of Los Angeles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

130384.

(a) The updated transit coordination and service program, and any amendment to the program, shall be adopted by the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission by eight affirmative votes of the voting members or designated alternates.

(b) The proposed updated program or the proposed amendment, as the case may be, shall be available to the public and to all transit operators in the County of Los Angeles for not less than 60 days prior to its adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

130385.

(a) Any transit operator in the County of Los Angeles which disagrees with any portion of the transit coordination and service program, or any amendment thereto, that impacts its transit services may request the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission to, and the commission shall, resolve the dispute pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 130370).

(b) In such a case, the portion of the program, or amendment thereto, shall not be implemented until the dispute has been resolved and, if necessary, the program or amendment has been revised according to the resolution of the dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Transaction and Use Taxes in the County of Orange [130400. - 130442.]

130400.

As used in this article:

(a) “Commission” means the county transportation commission created in Orange County pursuant to Section 130000.

(b) “County” means the County of Orange.

(c) “Transit operations” means all activities related to operating a transit system other than the purchase, construction, and maintenance of equipment, vehicles, and facilities for public transit purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130400.5.

The Legislature, by the enactment of this article, intends the county and cities therein to use any additional funds provided them by this article to supplement existing local revenues being used for public transportation purposes. The county and the cities therein are further encouraged to maintain their existing commitment of local funds for public transportation purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130401.

A retail transactions and use tax ordinance applicable in the incorporated and unincorporated territory of the county may be adopted by the commission in accordance with Section 130410 and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure vote to approve its imposition at a special election called for that purpose by the commission and an expenditure plan is adopted pursuant to Section 130406.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 343, Sec. 28.6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

130402.

The commission, in the ordinance, shall state the nature of the tax to be imposed, shall provide the tax rate or rates or the maximum tax rate or rates, and shall specify the purposes for which the revenue derived from the tax will be used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130403.

(a) The County of Orange shall conduct the special election called by the commission pursuant to Section 130401, and the commission shall reimburse the county for its cost in conducting the special election.

(b) The special election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of special elections by a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130404.

(a) Any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this article shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 120 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(b) Prior to the operative date of the ordinance, the commission shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130405.

The revenues from the taxes imposed pursuant to this article may be allocated by the commission for public transportation purposes, including, but not limited to, construction, maintenance, and operation of streets, roads, and highways, and the construction and maintenance of public transit systems, including exclusive public mass transit guideway systems, available now or hereafter. The revenues may also be used for improvements to the state highway system in the manner otherwise provided by law. However, the revenues shall not be allocated for transit operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130406.

(a) If the commission decides to adopt a retail transactions and use tax pursuant to this article, the commission shall review and assess the needs for the public transportation purposes specified in Section 130405. As part of this review and assessment, the commission shall solicit proposals for public transportation purposes from the Department of Transportation, the county, and the cities therein, and all public transit operators within the county. The commission shall adopt a procedure for evaluating these proposals in consultation with the Department of Transportation, the county, and the cities therein, and all public transit
 operators within the county.

(b) Based on the evaluation, the commission shall prepare a plan for the expenditure of the revenues expected to be derived from the tax provided for in this article, together with other federal, state, and local funds expected to be available for transportation improvements, for a period of 15 years.

(c) The expenditure plan shall include projections of revenues and expenditures for capital, maintenance, and operations purposes for categories of transportation facilities, including, but not limited to, freeways, arterial roads, local streets and roads, and transit.

(d) The commission shall not adopt the expenditure plan until it has received the approval of the board of supervisors and the city councils representing both a majority of the cities in the county and a majority of the
 population residing in incorporated areas of the county. Before adoption of an expenditure plan, the commission shall also conduct public hearings on that plan.

(e) The expenditure plan shall be finally adopted prior to the call of the election provided for in Section 130401. An amendment to the expenditure plan subject to protest pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 130407 shall be finally adopted by the commission after approval of the board of supervisors and the cities as specified in this section and public hearings on the amendments, and the amendment is effective upon that final adoption by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130407.

(a) The commission may annually review and propose amendments to the expenditure plan adopted pursuant to Section 130406 to provide for the use of additional federal, state, and local funds, to account for unexpected revenues, or to take into consideration unforeseen circumstances.

(b) The commission shall notify the board of supervisors and the city council of each city in the county and provide them with a copy of the proposed amendments.

(c) The proposed amendments shall become effective 45 days after
 notice is given pursuant to subdivision (b) except as follows:

(1) If the proposed amendment deletes a project which is included in the original adopted expenditure plan and which is located entirely within a city, the proposed amendment shall become effective only if the city council of the affected city, by resolution, concurs with the deletion of the project.

(2) If the proposed amendment deletes a project which is included in the original adopted expenditure plan and which is located entirely in the unincorporated area of the county, the proposed amendment shall become effective only if the board of supervisors, by resolution, concurs with the deletion of the project.

(3) In all cases other than those set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2), the proposed amendment shall become effective unless the board of
 supervisors, or city councils representing 25 percent of the cities in the county, adopt a resolution protesting the proposed amendments. If protested, the proposed amendments shall become effective only if the commission follows the approval procedure in subdivision (d) of Section 130406.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130408.

The expenditure plan adopted pursuant to Section 130406, and any amendment adopted pursuant to Section 130407, shall include a provision for an annual allocation of funds to the county and the cities therein for public transportation purposes.

In making annual allocations to the county and the cities therein, the commission may allocate the proceeds of any limited tax bonds authorized by the voters pursuant to Section 130412.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130409.

An amended expenditure plan adopted pursuant to Section 130407 may include a provision to reduce a tax rate to percentages lower than that approved by the voters and may further provide for an increase of the tax rate if it has previously been lowered; but the tax rate may not be increased to a rate above the tax rate approved by the voters. Any revised tax rate may be adopted only if the commission determines, by a two-thirds vote, that the proceeds of the taxes with the altered tax rate will be sufficient to provide for the payment of principal and interest of any limited tax bonds and any other indebtedness incurred by the commission which was to be
 payable from the proceeds of the retail transactions and use tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130409.5.

If a retail transactions and use tax is adopted pursuant to this article, the commission shall prepare and submit a report to the Department of Transportation, to the board of supervisors, to the city council of each city in the county, and to each public transit operator within the county on or before January 1 of the year following the end of the first full fiscal year after the date that the taxes are imposed pursuant to this article and annually thereafter. The report shall evaluate, and report the progress made in, the implementation of the expenditure plan in the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130410.

(a) The commission is authorized to impose a maximum tax rate of 1 percent under this article and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and the commission may state the maximum tax rate in terms of not to exceed 1 percent, or any lesser percentage thereof. The commission shall not levy the tax at a rate other than 1 percent or 34, 12, or
 14 of 1 percent, unless specifically authorized by the Legislature.

(b) The commission, in the ordinance, shall provide for limitations upon the time when the tax shall be in effect. Any tax rate or maximum tax rate adopted pursuant to this article, unless otherwise prohibited, may be increased when authorized by the commission by ordinance adopted in the manner and by the vote stated in Section 130401 and approved by a majority of the electors voting on the measure at an election called for that purpose by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130411.

(a) The actual wording of the proposition on any short form of ballot card, label, or other device, regardless of the system of voting used, shall read as follows: TRANSPORTATION—ORANGE COUNTY
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSIONTo improve, expand, construct, maintain, and
 operate the transportation system in the county, this proposition authorizes the Orange County Transportation Commission to adopt a _____ percent sales tax solely for transportation purposes.YESNO(b) The proposition shall set forth the actual percent of the transactions and use tax upon which the electors are
 voting.

(c) The sample ballot to be mailed to the voters, under Section 13303 of the Elections Code, shall be the full proposition as set forth in the ordinance calling the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 213.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

130412.

The commission may, as part of the same ballot proposition to approve the imposition of a retail transactions and use tax, seek authorization to issue bonds payable solely from the proceeds of the retail transactions and use tax. The maximum bonded indebtedness which may be authorized shall be an amount equal to the sum of the principal and interest on the bonds not to exceed the estimated proceeds of the retail transactions and use tax for a period of 30 years. The actual wording of the proposition on any short form of ballot card, label, or other device, regardless of the system of voting used, shall read as follows: TRANSPORTATION—ORANGE COUNTY
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSIONTo improve, expand, construct, maintain, and operate the transportation system in the county, this proposition authorizes the Orange County Transportation Commission to adopt a ____ percent sales tax solely for transportation purposes and/or to issue bonds payable from the proceeds of that sales tax.YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130413.

The commission may further, as part of the same proposition, submit to the voters a proposal to increase any appropriations limits heretofore imposed upon the commission by the amount of the proceeds of the sales tax not entitled to an exemption from those limits as debt service. In this case, the ballot proposition shall, in addition to the language set forth in Sections 130411 and 130412, further include the following words: “and increases the appropriations limit.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130420.

(a) The bonds authorized by the voters concurrently with the approval of the retail transactions and use tax may be issued by the commission at any time, and from time to time, payable solely from the proceeds of the tax. The bonds shall be referred to as “limited tax bonds.”

(b) The pledge of retail transactions and use taxes to the limited tax bonds authorized under this article shall have priority over the use of any of the funds for “pay-as-you-go” financing except to the extent that that priority is expressly restricted in the resolution providing for the issuance of
 the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130421.

(a) Limited tax bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted at any time, and from time to time, by the commission by a two-thirds vote of all members of the commission. Each resolution shall provide for the issuance of bonds in such amounts as the necessity therefor may appear, until the full amount of the bonds authorized shall have been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on its anniversary date. 

(b) A resolution providing for the
 issuance of bonds shall state all of the following:

(1) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to or connected with the accomplishment of those purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agents, financial consultant and other fees, bond and other reserve funds, working capital, bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter, and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(2) The estimated cost of accomplishing the purposes.

(3) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(4) The maximum term the bonds, proposed to be
 issued, shall run before maturity, which shall not exceed 31 years from the date thereof or the date of each series thereof.

(5) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed the maximum allowable by law.

(6) The denomination or denominations of the bonds, which shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(7) The form of the bonds, including, without limitation, registered bonds and coupon bonds, to the extent permitted by federal law, and the form of any coupons to be attached thereto, the registration, conversion, and exchange privileges, if any, pertaining thereto, and the time when the whole or any part of the principal shall become due and payable.

(c) The resolution may also contain any other matters authorized by this
 article or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130422.

(a) The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding the maximum allowable by law, payable semiannually, except that the first interest payable on the bonds or any series thereof may be for any period not exceeding one year as determined by the commission.

(b) In the resolution or resolutions providing for the issuance of the bonds, the commission may also provide for call and redemption of the bonds prior to maturity at such times and prices and upon such other terms as it may specify, provided that no bond shall be subject to call or redemption prior to
 maturity unless it contains a recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed thereon.

(c) The principal of and interest on the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the County of Orange or at such other place or places as may be designated, or at either place or places at the option of the holders of the bonds.

(d) The bonds, or each series thereof, shall be dated and numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the chairman or vice chairman of the commission and the auditor-controller of the County of Orange, and the official seal of the commission attached. The interest coupons of such bonds shall be signed by the auditor-controller of the County of Orange. All of the signatures and seal may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced, except that one of the signatures on the bonds shall be
 manually affixed. If any officer whose signature appears on bonds or coupons ceases to be such an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the officer’s signature is as effective as if the officer had remained in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130423.

(a) The bonds may be sold as the commission determines by resolution. The commission may sell the bonds at a price below par; provided, however, that the discount on any bonds so sold shall not exceed 5 percent of the par value thereof.

(b) Before selling the bonds, or any part thereof, the commission shall give notice inviting sealed bids in any manner as it may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the commission determines that the bids received are not
 satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the commission may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130424.

Delivery of any bonds may be made at any place either inside or outside the state, and the purchase price may be received in cash or bank credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130425.

All accrued interest and premiums received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury of the commission and applied to secure the bonds or for the purposes for which the debt was incurred; provided, however, that when the purposes have been accomplished, any moneys remaining shall be either (a) transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds or (b) placed in a fund to be used for the purchase of outstanding bonds of the commission from time to time in the open
 market at such prices and in such manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as the commission may determine. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1320, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

130430.

(a) The commission may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the commission upon the terms, at the times and in the manner which it determines.

(b) Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part of, the principal of the outstanding bonds, the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity, all expenses of the refunding, and either (a) the interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of sale thereof to the date of payment of the bonds to be